North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 3. Labor of Prisoners.
§ 148-32.1.
Local confinement, costs, alternate facilities, parole, work release. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 19.22A, effective July 1, 2009.

In the event that the custodian of the local confinement facility certifies in writing to the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the local confinement facility is located that the local confinement facility is filled to capacity, or that the facility cannot reasonably accommodate any more prisoners due to segregation requirements for particular prisoners, or that the custodian anticipates, in light of local experiences, an influx of temporary prisoners at that time, or if the local confinement facility does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

, any judge of the district court in the district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

where the facility is located, or any superior court judge who has jurisdiction pursuant to

G.S. 7A-47.1

or

G.S. 7A-48

in a district or set of districts as defined in

G.S. 7A-41.1

where the facility is located may order that a prisoner not housed pursuant to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established in subsection (b2) of this section be transferred to any other qualified local confinement facility within that district or within another such district where space is available, including a satellite jail unit operated pursuant to

G.S. 153A-230.3

if the prisoner is a non-violent misdemeanant, which local facility shall accept the transferred prisoner.If no other local confinement facility is available and the reason for the requested transfer is that the local confinement facility that would be required to house the prisoner cannot reasonably accommodate any more prisoners due to segregation requirements for particular prisoners or the local facility does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

, then the judge may order that a prisoner not housed pursuant to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established in subsection (b2) of this section be transferred to a facility operated by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety as designated by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice. In no event, however, shall a prisoner whose term of imprisonment is less than 30 days be assigned or ordered transferred to a facility operated by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

(b1)

It is the intent of the General Assembly to authorize the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice to enter into voluntary agreements with counties to provide housing for misdemeanants serving periods of confinement of more than 90 days and for all sentences imposed for impaired driving under

G.S. 20-138.1

, regardless of length. It is further the intent of the General Assembly that the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, in conjunction with the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc., establish a program for housing misdemeanants serving periods of confinement of more than 90 days and for all sentences imposed for impaired driving under

G.S. 20-138.1

, regardless of length. It is also the intent of the General Assembly that the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice contract with the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc., to provide a service that identifies space in local confinement facilities that is available for housing these misdemeanants.The General Assembly intends that the cost of housing and caring for these misdemeanants, including, but not limited to, care, supervision, transportation, medical, and any other related costs, be covered by State funds and not be imposed as a local cost. Therefore, the General Assembly intends that the funds appropriated for the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program be used to provide funding to cover the costs of managing a system for providing that housing of misdemeanants in local confinement facilities as well as reimbursing the counties for housing and related expenses for those misdemeanants.

(b2)

The Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program is established. The Program shall provide for the housing of misdemeanants from all counties serving sentences imposed for a period of more than 90 days and for all sentences imposed for impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, regardless of length. Those misdemeanants shall be confined in local confinement facilities except as provided in subsections (b3) and (b4) of this section. The Program shall address methods for the placement and transportation of inmates and reimbursement to counties for the housing of those inmates. Any county that voluntarily agrees to house misdemeanants from that county or from other counties pursuant to the Program may enter into a written agreement with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice to do so.The North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association shall:

Report no later than the fifteenth day of each month to the Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division on the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program. Each monthly report shall include all of the following:

The daily population delineated by misdemeanant or DWI monthly housing.

The cost of housing prisoners under the Program.

The cost of transporting prisoners under the Program.

Personnel costs.

Inmate medical care costs.

The number of counties that volunteer to house inmates under the Program.

The administrative costs paid to the Sheriffs’ Association and to the Department of Public Safety.

Report no later than October 1 of each year to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program. The report shall include the following with respect to the prior fiscal year:

The cost of housing prisoners by county under the Program.

The cost of transporting prisoners by county under the Program.

Personnel costs by county.

Inmate medical care costs by county.

The number of counties that volunteer to house inmates under the Program.

The administrative costs paid to the Sheriffs’ Association and to the Department of Public Safety.

(b3)

The custodian of a local confinement facility may request a judicial order to transfer a misdemeanant housed pursuant to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program to a facility operated by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice by certifying in writing to the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the local confinement facility is located that one of the following conditions is met:

(1)

The misdemeanant poses a security risk because the misdemeanant:

a.

Poses a serious escape risk.

b.

Exhibits violently aggressive behavior that cannot be contained and warrants a higher level of supervision.

c.

Needs to be protected from other inmates, and the county jail facility cannot provide such protection.

d.

Is a female or a person 18 years of age or younger, and the county jail facility does not have adequate housing for such prisoners.

e.

Is in custody at a time when a fire or other catastrophic event has caused the county jail facility to cease or curtail operations.

f.

Otherwise poses an imminent danger to the staff of the county jail facility or to other prisoners in the facility.

(2)

The misdemeanant requires medical or mental health treatment that the county decides can best be provided by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

The local confinement facility that would be required to house the prisoner (i) cannot reasonably accommodate any more prisoners due to segregation requirements for particular prisoners, or the local facility does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to G.S. 153A-221, and (ii) no other local confinement facility is available.Upon receiving such request and certification in writing, any superior or district court judge for the district in which the local confinement facility is located may, after ascertaining that the request meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, order the misdemeanant transferred to a unit of the State prison system designated by the Secretary of Public Safety or the Secretary’s authorized representative. Individuals meeting the condition set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection may be ordered to be transferred for an initial period not to exceed 30 days. The sheriff of the county from which the prisoner is removed shall be responsible for conveying the prisoner to the prison unit where the prisoner is to be held and for returning the prisoner to the jail of the county from which the prisoner was transferred. The officer in charge of the prison unit designated by the Secretary of Public Safety shall receive custody of the prisoner in accordance with the terms of the order. Prior to the conclusion of the 30-day period, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall conduct an assessment of treatment and venue needs. The assessment shall be conducted by the attending medical or mental health professional and shall assess the medical and mental health needs of the prisoner and make a recommendation on whether the prisoner should remain in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety or if the prisoner should be returned to the custody of the county. To extend the order beyond the initial 30-day period, the sheriff shall provide the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice assessment and any other relevant information to the resident judge or the superior court or any judge holding superior court in the district or any district court judge who shall determine whether to extend the transfer of the prisoner to a unit of the State prison system beyond the initial 30-day period. If the judge determines that the prisoner should remain in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the judge shall renew the order and include a date certain for review by the court. Prior to the date of review, the Division shall conduct a reassessment of treatment and venue needs and the sheriff shall provide the reassessment and any other relevant information to the court, as described in this subsection. If the judge determines that the prisoner should not remain in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the officer in charge of the prison unit designated by the Secretary of Public Safety shall release custody of the prisoner in accordance with the court order and the instructions of the attending medical or mental health professional. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be reimbursed from the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund for the costs of housing the misdemeanant, including the care, supervision, and transportation of the misdemeanant.

(b4)

A misdemeanant housed under the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established pursuant to subsection (b2) of this section may be transferred to a facility operated by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice if the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc., determines that the local confinement facilities available for housing misdemeanants under the Program are filled to capacity. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be reimbursed from the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund for the costs of housing the misdemeanant, including the care, supervision, and transportation of the misdemeanant.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-40, s. 6.

When a prisoner serving a sentence of 30 days or more in a local confinement facility is placed on work release pursuant to a recommendation of the sentencing court, the custodian of the facility shall forward the prisoner’s work-release earnings to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, which shall disburse the earnings as determined under G.S. 148-33.1(f). When a prisoner serving a sentence of 30 days or more in a local confinement facility is placed on work release pursuant to an order of the sentencing court, the custodian of the facility shall forward the prisoner’s work-release earnings to the clerk of the court that sentenced the prisoner or to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, as provided in the prisoner’s commitment order. The clerk or the Division, as appropriate, shall disburse the earnings as provided in the prisoner’s commitment order. Upon agreement between the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice and the custodian of the local confinement facility, however, the clerk may disburse to the local confinement facility the amount of the earnings to be paid for the cost of the prisoner’s keep, and that amount shall be set off against the reimbursement to be paid by the Department to the local confinement facility pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(a).

Upon entry of a prisoner serving a sentence of imprisonment for impaired driving under

G.S. 20-138.1

into a local confinement facility or to a detention facility approved by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice pursuant to this section, the custodian of the local confinement facility or detention facility shall forward to the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission information pertaining to the prisoner so as to make him eligible for parole consideration pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1371

. Such information shall include date of incarceration, jail credit, and such other information as may be required by the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission. The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall approve a form upon which the custodian shall furnish this information, which form will be provided to the custodian by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

History.

1977, c. 450, s. 3; c. 925, s. 2; 1981, c. 859, s. 25; 1985, c. 226, s. 3(1), (2); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, ss. 199, 201(e); 1987, c. 7, ss. 2, 6; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 120; c. 1100, s. 17.4(a); 1989, c. 1, s. 2; c. 761, s. 3; 1991, c. 217, s. 6; 1993, c. 538, s. 33; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 65; c. 24, s. 14(b); 1995, c. 324, s. 19.9(f); 1997-456, s. 23; 2004-199, s. 48; 2004-203, s. 54; 2009-451, s. 19.22A; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-192, s. 7(a), (d), (e), (g); 2014-100, s. 16C.1(f); 2015-40, s. 6; 2016-94, s. 17C.1(d); 2017-186, s. 2(vvvvvvv); 2020-83, ss. 8(m), 9(b); 2021-180, s. 19C.2.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-32.1

.

§ 148-32.1.
Local confinement, costs, alternate facilities, parole, work release. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 19.22A, effective July 1, 2009.

In the event that the custodian of the local confinement facility certifies in writing to the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the local confinement facility is located that the local confinement facility is filled to capacity, or that the facility cannot reasonably accommodate any more prisoners due to segregation requirements for particular prisoners, or that the custodian anticipates, in light of local experiences, an influx of temporary prisoners at that time, or if the local confinement facility does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

, any judge of the district court in the district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

where the facility is located, or any superior court judge who has jurisdiction pursuant to

G.S. 7A-47.1

or

G.S. 7A-48

in a district or set of districts as defined in

G.S. 7A-41.1

where the facility is located may order that a prisoner not housed pursuant to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established in subsection (b2) of this section be transferred to any other qualified local confinement facility within that district or within another such district where space is available, including a satellite jail unit operated pursuant to

G.S. 153A-230.3

if the prisoner is a non-violent misdemeanant, which local facility shall accept the transferred prisoner.If no other local confinement facility is available and the reason for the requested transfer is that the local confinement facility that would be required to house the prisoner cannot reasonably accommodate any more prisoners due to segregation requirements for particular prisoners or the local facility does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

, then the judge may order that a prisoner not housed pursuant to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established in subsection (b2) of this section be transferred to a facility operated by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction as designated by the Division of Prisons. In no event, however, shall a prisoner whose term of imprisonment is less than 30 days be assigned or ordered transferred to a facility operated by the Division of Prisons.

(b1)

It is the intent of the General Assembly to authorize the Division of Prisons to enter into voluntary agreements with counties to provide housing for misdemeanants serving periods of confinement of more than 90 days and for all sentences imposed for impaired driving under

G.S. 20-138.1

, regardless of length. It is further the intent of the General Assembly that the Division of Prisons, in conjunction with the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc., establish a program for housing misdemeanants serving periods of confinement of more than 90 days and for all sentences imposed for impaired driving under

G.S. 20-138.1

, regardless of length. It is also the intent of the General Assembly that the Division of Prisons contract with the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc., to provide a service that identifies space in local confinement facilities that is available for housing these misdemeanants.The General Assembly intends that the cost of housing and caring for these misdemeanants, including, but not limited to, care, supervision, transportation, medical, and any other related costs, be covered by State funds and not be imposed as a local cost. Therefore, the General Assembly intends that the funds appropriated for the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program be used to provide funding to cover the costs of managing a system for providing that housing of misdemeanants in local confinement facilities as well as reimbursing the counties for housing and related expenses for those misdemeanants.

(b2)

The Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program is established. The Program shall provide for the housing of misdemeanants from all counties serving sentences imposed for a period of more than 90 days and for all sentences imposed for impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1, regardless of length. Those misdemeanants shall be confined in local confinement facilities except as provided in subsections (b3) and (b4) of this section. The Program shall address methods for the placement and transportation of inmates and reimbursement to counties for the housing of those inmates. Any county that voluntarily agrees to house misdemeanants from that county or from other counties pursuant to the Program may enter into a written agreement with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice to do so.The North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association shall:

Report no later than the fifteenth day of each month to the Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division on the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program. Each monthly report shall include all of the following:

The daily population delineated by misdemeanant or DWI monthly housing.

The cost of housing prisoners under the Program.

The cost of transporting prisoners under the Program.

Personnel costs.

Inmate medical care costs.

The number of counties that volunteer to house inmates under the Program.

The administrative costs paid to the Sheriffs’ Association and to the Department of Public Safety.

Report no later than October 1 of each year to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program. The report shall include the following with respect to the prior fiscal year:

The cost of housing prisoners by county under the Program.

The cost of transporting prisoners by county under the Program.

Personnel costs by county.

Inmate medical care costs by county.

The number of counties that volunteer to house inmates under the Program.

The administrative costs paid to the Sheriffs’ Association and to the Department of Public Safety.

(b3)

The custodian of a local confinement facility may request a judicial order to transfer a misdemeanant housed pursuant to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program to a facility operated by the Division of Prisons by certifying in writing to the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the local confinement facility is located that one of the following conditions is met:

(1)

The misdemeanant poses a security risk because the misdemeanant:

a.

Poses a serious escape risk.

b.

Exhibits violently aggressive behavior that cannot be contained and warrants a higher level of supervision.

c.

Needs to be protected from other inmates, and the county jail facility cannot provide such protection.

d.

Is a female or a person 18 years of age or younger, and the county jail facility does not have adequate housing for such prisoners.

e.

Is in custody at a time when a fire or other catastrophic event has caused the county jail facility to cease or curtail operations.

f.

Otherwise poses an imminent danger to the staff of the county jail facility or to other prisoners in the facility.

(2)

The misdemeanant requires medical or mental health treatment that the county decides can best be provided by the Division of Prisons.

The local confinement facility that would be required to house the prisoner (i) cannot reasonably accommodate any more prisoners due to segregation requirements for particular prisoners, or the local facility does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to G.S. 153A-221, and (ii) no other local confinement facility is available.Upon receiving such request and certification in writing, any superior or district court judge for the district in which the local confinement facility is located may, after ascertaining that the request meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, order the misdemeanant transferred to a unit of the State prison system designated by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction or the Secretary’s authorized representative. Individuals meeting the condition set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection may be ordered to be transferred for an initial period not to exceed 30 days. The sheriff of the county from which the prisoner is removed shall be responsible for conveying the prisoner to the prison unit where the prisoner is to be held and for returning the prisoner to the jail of the county from which the prisoner was transferred. The officer in charge of the prison unit designated by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall receive custody of the prisoner in accordance with the terms of the order. Prior to the conclusion of the 30-day period, the Division of Prisons shall conduct an assessment of treatment and venue needs. The assessment shall be conducted by the attending medical or mental health professional and shall assess the medical and mental health needs of the prisoner and make a recommendation on whether the prisoner should remain in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or if the prisoner should be returned to the custody of the county. To extend the order beyond the initial 30-day period, the sheriff shall provide the Division of Prisons assessment and any other relevant information to the resident judge or the superior court or any judge holding superior court in the district or any district court judge who shall determine whether to extend the transfer of the prisoner to a unit of the State prison system beyond the initial 30-day period. If the judge determines that the prisoner should remain in the custody of the Division of Prisons, the judge shall renew the order and include a date certain for review by the court. Prior to the date of review, the Division shall conduct a reassessment of treatment and venue needs and the sheriff shall provide the reassessment and any other relevant information to the court, as described in this subsection. If the judge determines that the prisoner should not remain in the custody of the Division of Prisons, the officer in charge of the prison unit designated by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall release custody of the prisoner in accordance with the court order and the instructions of the attending medical or mental health professional. The Division of Prisons shall be reimbursed from the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund for the costs of housing the misdemeanant, including the care, supervision, and transportation of the misdemeanant.

(b4)

A misdemeanant housed under the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program established pursuant to subsection (b2) of this section may be transferred to a facility operated by the Division of Prisons if the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, Inc., determines that the local confinement facilities available for housing misdemeanants under the Program are filled to capacity. The Division of Prisons shall be reimbursed from the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund for the costs of housing the misdemeanant, including the care, supervision, and transportation of the misdemeanant.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-40, s. 6.

When a prisoner serving a sentence of 30 days or more in a local confinement facility is placed on work release pursuant to a recommendation of the sentencing court, the custodian of the facility shall forward the prisoner’s work-release earnings to the Division of Prisons, which shall disburse the earnings as determined under G.S. 148-33.1(f). When a prisoner serving a sentence of 30 days or more in a local confinement facility is placed on work release pursuant to an order of the sentencing court, the custodian of the facility shall forward the prisoner’s work-release earnings to the clerk of the court that sentenced the prisoner or to the Division of Prisons, as provided in the prisoner’s commitment order. The clerk or the Division, as appropriate, shall disburse the earnings as provided in the prisoner’s commitment order. Upon agreement between the Division of Prisons and the custodian of the local confinement facility, however, the clerk may disburse to the local confinement facility the amount of the earnings to be paid for the cost of the prisoner’s keep, and that amount shall be set off against the reimbursement to be paid by the Department to the local confinement facility pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(a).

Upon entry of a prisoner serving a sentence of imprisonment for impaired driving under

G.S. 20-138.1

into a local confinement facility or to a detention facility approved by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Prisons pursuant to this section, the custodian of the local confinement facility or detention facility shall forward to the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission information pertaining to the prisoner so as to make him eligible for parole consideration pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1371

. Such information shall include date of incarceration, jail credit, and such other information as may be required by the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission. The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall approve a form upon which the custodian shall furnish this information, which form will be provided to the custodian by the Division of Prisons.

History.

1977, c. 450, s. 3; c. 925, s. 2; 1981, c. 859, s. 25; 1985, c. 226, s. 3(1), (2); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, ss. 199, 201(e); 1987, c. 7, ss. 2, 6; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 120; c. 1100, s. 17.4(a); 1989, c. 1, s. 2; c. 761, s. 3; 1991, c. 217, s. 6; 1993, c. 538, s. 33; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 65; c. 24, s. 14(b); 1995, c. 324, s. 19.9(f); 1997-456, s. 23; 2004-199, s. 48; 2004-203, s. 54; 2009-451, s. 19.22A; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-192, s. 7(a), (d), (e), (g); 2014-100, s. 16C.1(f); 2015-40, s. 6; 2016-94, s. 17C.1(d); 2017-186, s. 2(vvvvvvv); 2020-83, ss. 8(m), 9(b); 2021-180, ss. 19C.2, 19C.9(p), (q), (z).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-32.1

.

§ 148-32.2.
Community work crew fee. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may charge a fee to any unit of local government to which it provides, upon request, a community work crew. The amount of the fee shall be no more than the cost to the Division to provide the crew to the unit of local government.

History.

2009-451, s. 19.24; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2014-100, s. 16C.2; 2017-186, s. 2(wwwwwww).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-32.2

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in the first sentence, and substituted “Division” for “Department” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 16C.2, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “, not to exceed a daily rate of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) per work crew” following “government” at the end of the last sentence in the section.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(wwwwwww), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p),
substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” at the beginning of the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-32.2.
Community work crew fee. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may charge a fee to any unit of local government to which it provides, upon request, a community work crew. The amount of the fee shall be no more than the cost to the Division to provide the crew to the unit of local government.

History.

2009-451, s. 19.24; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2014-100, s. 16C.2; 2017-186, s. 2(wwwwwww); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-32.2

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in the first sentence, and substituted “Division” for “Department” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 16C.2, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “, not to exceed a daily rate of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) per work crew” following “government” at the end of the last sentence in the section.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(wwwwwww), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p),
substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” at the beginning of the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-32.3.
Inmate Construction Program. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to the provisions of this Article, the State Construction Office may utilize inmates in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety through the Inmate Construction Program for repair and renovation projects on State-owned facilities, with priority given to Department of Public Safety construction projects. State agencies utilizing the Inmate Construction Program shall reimburse the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety for the cost of transportation, custody, and wages for the inmate crews.

History.

2020-78, s. 12.1.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-32.3

.

§ 148-32.3.
Inmate Construction Program. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to the provisions of this Article, the State Construction Office may utilize inmates in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction through the Inmate Construction Program for repair and renovation projects on State-owned facilities, with priority given to Department of Adult Correction construction projects. State agencies utilizing the Inmate Construction Program shall reimburse the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for the cost of transportation, custody, and wages for the inmate crews.

History.

2020-78, s. 12.1; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(gggg).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-32.3

.

§ 148-33.
Prison labor furnished other State agencies. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may furnish to any of the other State departments, State institutions, or agencies, upon such conditions as may be agreed upon from time to time between the Division and the governing authorities of such Department, institution or agency, prison labor for carrying on any work where it is practical and desirable to use prison labor in the furtherance of the purposes of any State department, institution or agency, and such other employment as is now provided by law for inmates of the State’s prison under the provisions of

G.S. 148-6

: Provided that such prisoners shall at all times be under the custody of and controlled by the duly authorized agent of such Division. Provided, further, that notwithstanding any provisions of law contained in this Article or in this Chapter, no prisoner or group of prisoners may be assigned to work in any building utilized by any State department, agency, or institution unless a duly designated custodial agent of the Secretary of Public Safety is assigned to the building to maintain supervision and control of the prisoner or prisoners working there.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 30; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1961, c. 966; 1967, c. 996, ss. 13, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2007-398, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxxx).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-398, s. 4, effective August 21, 2007, in the last sentence, deleted “male” twice preceding “prisoner” and preceding “prisoners,” and deleted “where women are housed or employed” preceding “unless a duly designated custodial agent.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction,” substituted “Division” for “Department,” and substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction.”

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 61, effective June 26, 2012, deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxxxx), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the middle of the last sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.